Hawaii, session 2026, GM1233.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 286-303, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows:
"(c) Every application for an identification card or
duplicate of an identification card shall be made on a form
developed by the director and furnished by the examiner of
drivers, signed by the applicant, and signed by the applicant's
parent or guardian if the applicant is under [eighteen] sixteen
years of age. The application shall contain the following
information:
(1) Name and complete address, including the number and
street name, of the applicant's permanent residence;
(2) The applicant's occupation and any pertinent data
relating thereto;
(3) The applicant's citizenship status;
(4) The applicant's veteran status if applicable and
desired by the applicant;
(5) The applicant's date and place of birth;
2026-3281 HB1667 GDI HMSO

Page 2 H.B. NO. 2^1
C.D. 1
(6) General description of the applicant, including the
applicant's gender designation, height, weight, hair
color, and eye color;
(7) The applicant's left and right index fingerprints or,
if clear impressions cannot be obtained, other
identifying imprints as specified by rules of the
director;
(8) The social security number of the applicant; and
(9) A digitized frontal photograph of the applicant's full
face.
Each applicant shall present documentary evidence as required by
the examiner of drivers of the applicant's age and identity, and
the applicant shall swear or affirm that all information given
is true and correct; provided that an applicant shall not be
required to provide documentation to prove the applicant's
gender designation other than the applicant's self-certification
of their chosen gender designation; provided further that
documentation that may incidentally show an applicant's birth
gender may be required if necessary to establish that the
applicant is legally entitled to an identification card.
2026-3281 HB1667 GDI HMSO 2
■ilillHnHHIBnMI

Page 3 1667
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
For purposes of this subsection, "gender designation"
[shall■have] has the same meaning as defined in section
286-109 (a) ."
SECTION 2. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2027.
2026-3281 HB1667 CDl HMSO 3
uiiiiiiniiiniiiiiiiNii

H.B. NO. 1667
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 24th day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1667, HD 1, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1667, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 1, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
19-26